Washington statutes.
RCW 9.66.050

Deposit of unwholesome substance.

Every person who shall deposit, leave or keep, on or near a highway or route of public travel, on land or water, any unwholesome substance; or who shall establish, maintain or carry on, upon or near a highway or route of public travel, on land or water, any business, trade or manufacture which is noisome or detrimental to the public health; or who shall deposit or cast into any lake, creek or river, wholly or partly in this state, the offal from or the dead body of any animal, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1909 c 249 s 285; RRS s 2537.]

NOTES:

Discharging ballast: RCW 88.28.060.

Disposal of dead animals: Chapter 16.68 RCW.

Water pollution: Chapter 35.88 RCW, RCW 70.54.010 through 70.54.030, chapter 90.48 RCW.